Maryland, session 2025, HB0580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–301.
(f) (3) (iii) An amount annually as set forth in the State budget shall be
distributed to the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association for the Widows’
and Orphans’ Fund.
Article – Education
13–511.
(b) (1) The Advisory Council consists of 31 members. The members shall be
appointed by the Board from a list of three qualified nominees submitted to the Board by
their respective organizations or associations represented on the Council. The
appointments by the Board shall be subject to the approval of the Governor.
(2) Of the 31 members:
(vi) One shall be a representative of the Maryland State [Firemen’s]
FIREFIGHTERS Association;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 514
18–602.
(a) There is a program of scholarships for children of volunteer [fire fighters]
FIREFIGHTERS or volunteer ambulance or rescue squad members who died or were
disabled by an accident resulting from:
(1) Performing any duties necessary to the operation or maintenance of the
fire company; or
(2) Actively participating in the ambulance or rescue squad work of an
incorporated volunteer fire company or volunteer ambulance or rescue squad in the State.
(b) The recipient of a scholarship under this section shall be a graduate of an
accredited high school.
(c) The Board of Trustees of the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS
Association, in its discretion, shall:
(1) Determine the amount of each award; and
(2) Select the recipient of each award.
(d) The Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association shall provide
the funds for these awards.
Article – Health – General
18–213.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Contagious disease or virus” means:
(i) Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV);
(ii) Meningococcal meningitis;
(iii) Tuberculosis;
(iv) Mononucleosis;
(v) Any form of viral hepatitis, including but not limited to hepatitis
A, B, C, D, E, F, and G;
(vi) Diphtheria;
– 3 –

Ch. 514 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vii) Plague;
(viii) Hemorrhagic fevers; or
(ix) Rabies.
(3) “Correctional institution” means a place of detention or correctional
confinement operated by or for the State or a local government.
(4) (i) “Correctional officer” means a member of a correctional unit who
is charged with and actually performs those duties that relate to the investigation, care,
custody, control, or supervision of persons confined to places of incarceration.
(ii) “Correctional officer” includes any sheriff, warden,
superintendent, or any other person having an equivalent title.
(5) “Law enforcement officer” means any person who, in an official
capacity, is authorized by law to make arrests and who is a member of one of the following
law enforcement agencies:
(i) The Department of State Police;
(ii) The Baltimore City Police Department;
(iii) The police department, bureau, or force of any county;
(iv) The police department, bureau, or force of any incorporated city
or town;
(v) The office of the sheriff of any county;
(vi) The police department, bureau, or force of any bicounty agency
or constituent institution of the University System of Maryland, Morgan State University,
St. Mary’s College, or of any institution under the jurisdiction of the Maryland Higher
Education Commission;
(vii) The Maryland Transit Administration police force of the
Department of Transportation, the Maryland Transportation Authority Police Force, and
the Maryland Port Administration police force of the Department of Transportation;
(viii) The law enforcement officers of the Department of Natural
Resources;
(ix) The Field Enforcement Bureau of the Comptroller’s Office;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 514
(x) The Field Enforcement Division of the Alcohol and Tobacco
Commission;
(xi) The Crofton Police Department;
(xii) The Intelligence and Investigative Division of the Department of
Public Safety and Correctional Services; or
(xiii) The Ocean Pines Police Department.
(6) “Medical care facility” means a hospital as defined in § 19–301 of this
article or a health care facility of a correctional institution.
(b) While treating or transporting an ill or injured patient to a medical care
facility or while acting in the performance of duty, if a paid or volunteer [fire fighter]
FIREFIGHTER, emergency medical technician, or rescue [squadman] SQUAD MEMBER
comes into contact with a patient who is subsequently diagnosed as having a contagious
disease or virus, as a result of information obtained in conjunction with the services
provided during the visit to the facility, the attending physician, medical examiner, a
designee of the medical care facility who receives the patient, the Chief Medical Examiner,
or the Chief Medical Examiner’s designee shall notify the [fire fighter] FIREFIGHTER,
emergency medical technician, or rescue [squadman] SQUAD MEMBER, and the employer
or employer’s designee of the individual’s possible exposure to the contagious disease or
virus.
(c) If, while treating or transporting an ill or injured patient to a medical care
facility or while acting in the performance of duty, a law enforcement officer comes into
contact with a patient who is subsequently diagnosed, as a result of information obtained
in conjunction with the services provided during the visit to the facility, as having a
contagious disease or virus, the attending physician, medical examiner, a designee of the
medical care facility who receives the patient, the Chief Medical Examiner or the Chief
Medical Examiner’s designee shall notify the law enforcement officer and the officer’s
employer or employer’s designee of the officer’s possible exposure to the contagious disease
or virus.
(d) If, while treating or transporting an ill or injured incarcerated individual to a
medical care facility or while acting in the performance of duty, a correctional officer comes
into contact with an incarcerated individual who is subsequently diagnosed, as a result of
information obtained in conjunction with the services provided during the visit to the
facility, as having a contagious disease or virus, the attending physician, medical examiner,
a designee of the medical care facility that receives the incarcerated individual, the Chief
Medical Examiner, or the Chief Medical Examiner’s designee shall notify the correctional
officer and the correctional officer’s correctional institution or the correctional institution’s
designee of the officer’s possible exposure to the contagious disease or virus.
(e) The notification required under subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this section shall:
– 5 –

Ch. 514 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) Be made within 48 hours, or sooner, of confirmation of the patient’s
diagnosis;
(2) Include subsequent written confirmation of possible exposure to the
contagious disease or virus;
(3) Be conducted in a manner that will protect the confidentiality of the
patient; and
(4) To the extent possible, be conducted in a manner that will protect the
confidentiality of the [fire fighter] FIREFIGHTER, emergency medical technician, rescue
[squadman] SQUAD MEMBER, law enforcement officer, or correctional officer.
(f) The written confirmation required under subsection (e)(2) of this section shall
constitute compliance with this section.
(g) Each medical care facility shall develop written procedures for the
implementation of this section, and, upon request, make copies available to the local fire
authority, the local fire authority’s designee, the local law enforcement authority, the local
law enforcement authority’s designee, the correctional officer, or the correctional
institution’s designee having jurisdiction.
(h) A medical care facility, physician, Chief Medical Examiner, or the Chief
Medical Examiner’s designee acting in good faith to provide notification in accordance with
this section may not be liable in any cause of action related to the breach of patient
confidentiality.
(i) A medical care facility, physician, Chief Medical Examiner, or the Chief
Medical Examiner’s designee acting in good faith to provide notification in accordance with
this section may not be liable in any cause of action for:
(1) The failure to give the required notice, if the [fire fighter]
FIREFIGHTER, emergency medical technician, rescue [squadman] SQUAD MEMBER, law
enforcement officer, or correctional officer fails to properly initiate the notification
procedures developed by the health care facility under subsection (g) of this section; or
(2) The failure of the employer or employer’s designee to subsequently
notify the [fire fighter] FIREFIGHTER, emergency medical technician, rescue [squadman]
SQUAD MEMBER, law enforcement officer, or correctional officer of the possible exposure
to a contagious disease or virus.
(j) A [fire fighter] FIREFIGHTER, emergency medical technician, rescue
[squadman] SQUAD MEMBER, law enforcement officer, or correctional officer shall receive
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 514
from their employers or local governmental bodies, at the expense of the employer or local
governmental body, as part of their training, education on:
(1) (i) The routes of transmission of HIV and hepatitis B virus; and
(ii) The routes by which a [fire fighter] FIREFIGHTER, emergency
medical technician, rescue [squadman] SQUAD MEMBER, law enforcement officer, or
correctional officer may be exposed to HIV and hepatitis B virus; and
(2) The current Centers for Disease Control and Prevention guidelines for
preventing prehospital exposure to HIV and hepatitis B while rendering emergency
medical care.
(k) A [fire fighter] FIREFIGHTER, emergency medical technician, rescue
[squadman] SQUAD MEMBER, law enforcement officer, or correctional officer shall receive
from their employers, associations, or local governmental bodies, at the employers’,
associations’, or local governmental bodies’ expense, equipment recommended by the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to protect a [fire fighter] FIREFIGHTER,
emergency medical technician, rescue [squadman] SQUAD MEMBER, law enforcement
officer, or correctional officer from exposure to HIV and hepatitis B while rendering
emergency medical care.
(l) (1) The fire department, law enforcement agency, and all other agencies or
organizations employing a [fire fighter] FIREFIGHTER, emergency medical technician,
rescue [squadman] SQUAD MEMBER, law enforcement officer, or correctional officer shall
develop written procedures for the implementation of this section.
(2) On request, copies of the procedures developed in this subsection shall
be made available to employees, employee unions, volunteer associations, and the
Secretary.
(m) A person under this section may not refuse to treat or transport an individual
because the individual is HIV positive.
Article – Labor and Employment
3–213.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a minor may not be employed or
allowed to work:
(2) in, about, or in connection with:
(iv) an engineer, [fireman] FIREFIGHTER, or pilot on a vessel that
is engaged in commerce; or
– 7 –

Ch. 514 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Public Safety
7–201.
In Part I of this subtitle, “Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Maryland State
[Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association.
7–202.
(a) (1) A member of a volunteer fire company or volunteer rescue squad is
eligible for disability benefits from the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS
Association if:
(i) the member’s fire company or rescue squad recommends that the
member receive benefits; and
(ii) the member is permanently or temporarily disabled:
1. as a direct result of actively participating in fighting a fire;
2. while going to or from a fire;
3. while performing other duties necessary to the operation
or maintenance of the fire company;
4. while actively participating in the emergency medical
services unit, or rescue work of a volunteer advanced life support unit or a volunteer fire,
ambulance, or rescue company located in the State; or
5. while providing emergency or rescue assistance, whether
acting alone or at the direction of or with a fire, ambulance, or rescue company or advanced
life support unit.
(2) A benefit under this section shall be paid:
(i) regardless of the district in which the beneficiary was disabled;
or
(ii) regardless of whether the beneficiary was disabled in this State,
Delaware, the District of Columbia, Pennsylvania, Virginia, or West Virginia.
(b) The Board shall pay a benefit under this section from the treasury of the
Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association in the amount and in the manner
that the Board determines until the beneficiary is no longer disabled.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 514
(c) The secretary of the Board shall add the name of each beneficiary under this
section to the Disabled [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTER’S and Rescue [Squadmen’s] SQUAD
PERSON’S List.
7–203.
(a) (1) The Board shall pay death benefits under this section if a member of a
volunteer fire company or member of a volunteer rescue squad dies:
(i) as a direct result of actively participating in fighting a fire;
(ii) while going to or from a fire;
(iii) while performing other duties necessary to the operation or
maintenance of the fire company;
(iv) while actively participating in the ambulance, advanced life
support, or rescue work of a volunteer advanced life support unit or volunteer fire,
ambulance, or rescue company located in the State; or
(v) while providing emergency or rescue assistance, whether acting
alone or at the direction of or with a fire, ambulance, or rescue company or advanced life
support unit.
(2) A benefit under this subsection shall be paid:
(i) regardless of the district in which the decedent died; or
(ii) regardless of whether the decedent died in this State, Delaware,
the District of Columbia, Pennsylvania, Virginia, or West Virginia.
(b) (1) The Board shall pay a benefit under this section from the treasury of
the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association in the amount that the Board
determines, but not less than $2,000.
(2) The Board shall pay a benefit under this subsection:
(i) to the decedent’s surviving spouse or dependent child;
(ii) if no individual is eligible under item (i) of this paragraph, to the
decedent’s surviving dependent parent;
(iii) if no individual is eligible under item (i) or (ii) of this paragraph,
to each surviving child of the decedent in equal shares;
– 9 –

Ch. 514 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) if no individual is eligible under item (i), (ii), or (iii) of this
paragraph, to the decedent’s surviving parent; or
(v) if no individual is eligible under item (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this
paragraph, to each surviving sister, brother, or grandparent of the decedent in equal
shares.
(c) (1) If there is a surviving spouse or dependent child:
(i) until the surviving spouse remarries, the surviving spouse is
entitled to receive a pension from the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS
Association; and
(ii) until the dependent child becomes an adult, each dependent child
is entitled to receive a pension from the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS
Association.
(2) The Board shall pay a benefit under this subsection from the treasury
of the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association in the amount, at the
times, and in the installments that the Board determines.
(3) The secretary of the Board shall add the name of each beneficiary under
this subsection to the Disabled [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTER’S and Rescue [Squadmen’s]
SQUAD PERSON’S List.
8–103.
(b) (4) In determining need under this subsection, the county shall consider:
(i) the failure to meet minimum standards established by the county
or the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association;
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (6) of this subsection, each county shall distribute
the money provided under this subtitle on the basis of need to fire, rescue, and ambulance
companies, departments, or stations in the county, including companies, departments, or
stations:
(i) located in municipal corporations; or
(ii) located outside the State if the company, department, or station:
1. has been a member of the Maryland State [Firemen’s]
FIREFIGHTERS Association for at least the past 10 years; and
2. has a first due response area in the State.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 514
(3) In determining need under this subsection, the county shall consider:
(i) the failure to meet minimum standards established by the county
or the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association;
8–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Association” means the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS
Association.
Article – Tax – General
10–208.
(i–1) (5) (ii) Each fire, rescue, or emergency medical services organization or
auxiliary organization shall:
3. provide a report that includes the names, Social Security
numbers, and points earned by those members qualifying for the subtraction modification
under this subsection to the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association by
May 1 of the following year.
(7) (ii) On or before October 1 of each year, the Maryland State
[Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association shall submit to the Department of Public Safety
and Correctional Services and the Office of the Comptroller a report stating the
participation in the point system by the various local subdivisions with the names and
Social Security numbers of individuals who qualified for the subtraction modification under
this subsection for the preceding taxable year.
Article – Transportation
16–102.
(b) (2) The Administration shall adopt the regulations required under this
subsection in consultation with:
(i) The Maryland [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association;
21–106.
(c) (3) (i) The driver of an emergency vehicle may not use flashing lights
or a bell, siren, or exhaust whistle while returning from an emergency call, fire alarm, or
– 11 –

Ch. 514 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
motorcade or escort, except that fire apparatus carrying standing [firemen]
FIREFIGHTERS may use flashing lights that are visible only to the rear.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction made in an editor’s note following the
section affected.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 12 –